Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-934
Nondegree recreational and avocational courses; self-supporting; exception.

All direct costs of nondegree recreational and avocational courses shall, on the average, be self-supporting through student tuition and fee charges or designated grants or contracts by July 1, 1979. This section shall not apply to the Cooperative Extension Service of the University of Nebraska.

Laws 1978, LB 756, § 18.